Massachusetts, session 194th, H4553.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Chapter 32A of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after 
section 17Z the following section:- 
Section 17AA. Any coverage offered by the commission to an active or retired employee 
of the commonwealth insured under the group insurance commission shall provide coverage for: 
(a) necessary pre-cancer dental care, including preventative and restorative treatment to 
the hard and soft tissues of the oral cavity, fluoride treatments and trays, and medically necessary 
dental procedures, to reduce or eliminate the risk of infection or to treat tooth decay or tooth loss 
in enrollees. 
(b) dental care that is required prior to the commencement of treatment for head and neck 
cancer including, but not limited to, chemotherapy, immunotherapy, biological therapy, proton 
therapy, and radiation therapy. 

of 10 12  (c) post cancer necessary dental care, including preventative dental phophylaxis’, scaling 
and root planing, quarterly cleanings, bi-annual assessments by a periodontist, fluoride 
treatments including trays, and medically necessary dental procedures to reduce or eliminate the 
risk of infection; or to treat tooth loss or decay directly or indirectly caused by head and neck 
cancer 
treatment. 
(d) dental procedures required as a result of treatments for head and neck cancer 
including, but not limited to, chemotherapy, immunotherapy, biological therapy, proton therapy, 
and radiation therapy  
(e) laboratory assessments, medications, treatments, evaluations, examinations, and 
rehabilitation necessary for head and neck cancer treatment and the restoration of function.  
(f) patient education, medical devices, prostheses, obturators, dental implants, 
rehabilitative services necessary to restore, maintain, or improve, the whole or partial function 
related to eating, breathing, voice, speech, quality of life, social functioning and swallowing; and 
to 
approximate the normal appearance of any abnormal structures that is affected by a head 
and neck cancer diagnosis and/or the treatment of head and neck cancer, or the side effects 
resulting from the treatment. 
(g) restorative and rehabilitative care including but not limited to: medications, 
restoration procedures, and other medical interventions required to address impairments resulting 
from head and neck cancer or its treatment.  

of 10 33  SECTION 2. Chapter 118E of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after 
section 10Z the following section:- 
Section 10AA. The division shall provide coverage for: 
(a) necessary pre-cancer dental care, including preventative and restorative treatment to 
the hard and soft tissues of the oral cavity, fluoride treatments and trays, and medically necessary 
dental procedures, to reduce or eliminate the risk of infection or to treat tooth decay or tooth loss 
in enrollees. 
(b) dental care that is required prior to the commencement of treatment for head and neck 
cancer including, but not limited to, chemotherapy, immunotherapy, biological therapy, proton 
therapy, and radiation therapy. 
(c) post cancer necessary dental care, including preventative dental phophylaxis’, scaling 
and root planing, quarterly cleanings, bi-annual assessments by a periodontist, fluoride 
treatments including trays, and medically necessary dental procedures to reduce or eliminate the 
risk of infection; or to treat tooth loss or decay directly or indirectly caused by head and neck 
cancer treatment. 
(d) dental procedures required as a result of treatments for head and neck cancer 
including, but not limited to, chemotherapy, immunotherapy, biological therapy, proton therapy, 
and radiation therapy. 
(e) laboratory assessments, medications, treatments, evaluations, examinations, and 
rehabilitation necessary for head and neck cancer treatment and the restoration of function. 

of 10 53  (f) patient education, medical devices, prostheses, obturators, dental implants, 
rehabilitative services necessary to restore, maintain, or improve, the whole or partial function 
related to eating, breathing, voice, speech, quality of life, social functioning and swallowing; and 
to 
approximate the normal appearance of any abnormal structures that is affected by a head 
and neck cancer diagnosis and/or the treatment of head and neck cancer, or the side effects 
resulting from the treatment.  
(g) restorative and rehabilitative care including but not limited to: medications, 
restoration procedures, and other medical interventions required to address impairments resulting 
from head and neck cancer or its treatment. 
SECTION 3. Chapter 175 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting before 
section 47CCC the following section:- 
Section 47AAA. Any blanket or general policy of insurance described in subdivision (A), 
(C), or (D) of section one hundred and ten which is issued or subsequently renewed by 
agreement between the insurer and the policyholder, within or without the commonwealth, 
during the period within which this premium is effective, or any policy of accident or sickness 
insurance as described in section one hundred and eight which provides hospital expense and 
surgical expense insurance and which is delivered or issued for delivery or subsequently renewed 
by agreement between the insurer and the policyholder in the commonwealth, during the period 
within which this provision is effective, or any employers' health and welfare fund which 
provides hospital expense and surgical expense benefits and which is issued or renewed to any 

of 10 74 person or group of persons in the commonwealth, during the period within which this provision 
is effective, shall provide coverage for:  
(a) necessary pre-cancer dental care, including preventative and restorative treatment to 
the hard and soft tissues of the oral cavity, fluoride treatments and trays, and medically necessary 
dental procedures, to reduce or eliminate the risk of infection or to treat tooth decay or tooth loss 
in enrollees. 
(b) dental care that is required prior to the commencement of treatment for head and neck 
cancer including, but not limited to, chemotherapy, immunotherapy, biological therapy, proton 
therapy, and radiation therapy. 
(c) post cancer necessary dental care, including preventative dental phophylaxis’, scaling 
and root planing, quarterly cleanings, bi-annual assessments by a periodontist, fluoride 
treatments including trays, and medically necessary dental procedures to reduce or eliminate the 
risk of infection; or to treat tooth loss or decay directly or indirectly caused by head and neck 
cancer treatment. 
(d) dental procedures required as a result of treatments for head and neck cancer 
including, but not limited to, chemotherapy, immunotherapy, biological therapy, proton therapy, 
and radiation therapy. 
(e) laboratory assessments, medications, treatments, evaluations, examinations, and 
rehabilitation necessary for head and neck cancer treatment and the restoration of function. 
(f) patient education, medical devices, prostheses, obturators, dental implants, 
rehabilitative services necessary to restore, maintain, or improve, the whole or partial function 

of 10 95 related to eating, breathing, voice, speech, quality of life, social functioning and swallowing; and 
to approximate the normal appearance of any abnormal structures that is affected by a head and 
neck cancer diagnosis and/or the treatment of head and neck cancer, or the side effects resulting 
from the treatment. 
(g) restorative and rehabilitative care including but not limited to: medications, 
100 restoration procedures, and other medical interventions required to address impairments resulting 
101 from head and neck cancer or its treatment.  
102  SECTION 4. Chapter 176A of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after 
103 section 8DDD the following section:- 
104  Section 8EEE. A contract between a subscriber and the corporation under an individual 
105 or group hospital service plan that is delivered, issued or renewed within the commonwealth 
106 shall provide coverage for: 
107  (a) necessary pre-cancer dental care, including preventative and restorative treatment to 
108 the hard and soft tissues of the oral cavity, fluoride treatments and trays, and medically necessary 
109 dental procedures, to reduce or eliminate the risk of infection or to treat tooth decay or tooth loss 
110 in enrollees.  
111  (b) dental care that is required prior to the commencement of treatment for head and neck 
112 cancer including, but not limited to, chemotherapy, immunotherapy, biological therapy, proton 
113 therapy, and radiation therapy. 
114  (c) post cancer necessary dental care, including preventative dental phophylaxis’, scaling 
115 and root planing, quarterly cleanings, bi-annual assessments by a periodontist, fluoride 

of 10 116 treatments including trays, and medically necessary dental procedures to reduce or eliminate the 
117 risk of infection; or to treat tooth loss or decay directly or indirectly caused by head and neck 
118 cancer treatment. 
119  (d) dental procedures required as a result of treatments for head and neck cancer 
120 including, but not limited to, chemotherapy, immunotherapy, biological therapy, proton therapy, 
121 and radiation therapy. 
122  (e) laboratory assessments, medications, treatments, evaluations, examinations, and 
123 rehabilitation necessary for head and neck cancer treatment and the restoration of function. 
124  (f) patient education, medical devices, prostheses, obturators, dental implants, 
125 rehabilitative services necessary to restore, maintain, or improve, the whole or partial function 
126 related to eating, breathing, voice, speech, quality of life, social functioning and swallowing; and 
127 to approximate the normal appearance of any abnormal structures that is affected by a head and 
128 neck cancer diagnosis and/or the treatment of head and neck cancer, or the side effects resulting 
129 from the treatment. 
130  (g) restorative and rehabilitative care including but not limited to: medications, 
131 restoration procedures, and other medical interventions required to address impairments resulting 
132 from head and neck cancer or its treatment.  
133  SECTION 5. Chapter 176B of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after 
134 section 4DDD the following section:- 
135  Section 4EEE. A subscription certificate under an individual or group medical service 
136 agreement delivered, issued or renewed within the commonwealth shall provide coverage for: 

of 10 137  (a) necessary pre-cancer dental care, including preventative and restorative treatment to 
138 the hard and soft tissues of the oral cavity, fluoride treatments and trays, and medically necessary 
139 dental procedures, to reduce or eliminate the risk of infection or to treat tooth decay or tooth loss 
140 in enrollees. 
141  (b) dental care that is required prior to the commencement of treatment for head and neck 
142 cancer including, but not limited to, chemotherapy, immunotherapy, biological therapy, proton 
143 therapy, and radiation therapy. 
144  (c) post cancer necessary dental care, including preventative dental phophylaxis’, scaling 
145 and root planing, quarterly cleanings, bi-annual assessments by a periodontist, fluoride 
146 treatments including trays, and medically necessary dental procedures to reduce or eliminate the 
147 risk of infection; or to treat tooth loss or decay directly or indirectly caused by head and neck 
148 cancer treatment. 
149  (d) dental procedures required as a result of treatments for head and neck cancer 
150 including, but not limited to, chemotherapy, immunotherapy, biological therapy, proton therapy, 
151 and radiation therapy. 
152  (e) laboratory assessments, medications, treatments, evaluations, examinations, and 
153 rehabilitation necessary for head and neck cancer treatment and the restoration of function. 
154  (f) patient education, medical devices, prostheses, obturators, dental implants, 
155 rehabilitative services necessary to restore, maintain, or improve, the whole or partial function 
156 related to eating, breathing, voice, speech, quality of life, social functioning and swallowing; and 
157 to approximate the normal appearance of any abnormal structures that is affected by a head and 

of 10 158 neck cancer diagnosis and/or the treatment of head and neck cancer, or the side effects resulting 
159 from the treatment. 
160  (g) restorative and rehabilitative care including but not limited to: medications, 
161 restoration procedures, and other medical interventions required to address impairments resulting 
162 from head and neck cancer or its treatment.  
163  SECTION 6. Chapter 176G of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after 
164 section 4VV the following section:- 
165  Section 4WW. An individual or group health maintenance contract shall provide 
166 coverage for: 
167  (a) necessary pre-cancer dental care, including preventative and restorative treatment to 
168 the hard and soft tissues of the oral cavity, fluoride treatments and trays, and medically necessary 
169 dental procedures, to reduce or eliminate the risk of infection or to treat tooth decay or tooth loss 
170 in enrollees. 
171  (b) dental care that is required prior to the commencement of treatment for head and neck 
172 cancer including, but not limited to, chemotherapy, immunotherapy, biological therapy, proton 
173 therapy, and radiation therapy. 
174  (c) post cancer necessary dental care, including preventative dental phophylaxis’, scaling 
175 and root planing, quarterly cleanings, bi-annual assessments by a periodontist, fluoride 
176 treatments including trays, and medically necessary dental procedures to reduce or eliminate the 
177 risk of infection; or to treat tooth loss or decay directly or indirectly caused by head and neck 
178 cancer treatment. 

of 10 179  (d) dental procedures required as a result of treatments for head and neck cancer 
180 including, but not limited to, chemotherapy, immunotherapy, biological therapy, proton therapy, 
181 and radiation therapy.  
182  (e) laboratory assessments, medications, treatments, evaluations, examinations, and 
183 rehabilitation necessary for head and neck cancer treatment and the restoration of function. 
184  (f) patient education, medical devices, prostheses, obturators, dental implants, 
185 rehabilitative services necessary to restore, maintain, or improve, the whole or partial function 
186 related to eating, breathing, voice, speech, quality of life, social functioning and swallowing; and 
187 to approximate the normal appearance of any abnormal structures that is affected by a head and 
188 neck cancer diagnosis and/or the treatment of head and neck cancer, or the side effects resulting 
189 from the treatment. 
190  (g) restorative and rehabilitative care including but not limited to: medications, 
191 restoration procedures, and other medical interventions required to address impairments resulting 
192 from head and neck cancer or its treatment.